Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.92.130

Grants, gifts, bequests, and devises of property.

The office shall be authorized to accept grants, gifts, bequests, and devises of real and personal property from any source for the purpose of granting financial aid in addition to that funded by the state.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 165; 2004 c 275 s 42; 1969 ex.s. c 222 s 18. Formerly RCW 28B.10.820, 28.76.520.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Part headings not law—2004 c 275: See note following RCW 28B.76.090.